Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.40.040

Unlawful imprisonment.

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful imprisonment if he or she knowingly restrains another person.

(2) Unlawful imprisonment is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 365; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.40.040.]